Utah statutes.
58-37b-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as provided in Section
58-37-2.
(2)  "Distribute" means the actual, constructive, or attempted sale, transfer,
delivery, or dispensing to another of an imitation controlled substance.
(3)  "Imitation controlled substance" means a substance that is not a
controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance, and which by overall
dosage unit substantially resembles a specific controlled substance in
appearance, including its color, shape, or size.
(4)  "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, compounding, processing,
encapsulating, tableting, packaging or repackaging, labeling or relabeling, of
an imitation controlled substance.
